src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.dic
abomino/AP
abundo/APS
accelero/APS
accersito/A
accommodo/APS
accumulo/APS
accuro/APS
actito/APS
adaequo/APS
adamo/APS
adapto/APS
adcommodo/APS
adfirmo/APS
adiuvo/A
admiror/A
adnoto/APS
adnumero/APS
adorno/APS
adsigno/APS
adumbro/APS
adversor/A
aemulor/A
aequedisto/A
aequepondero/APS
aequidisto/A
aequiparo/APS
aequipero/APS
aequipondero/A
aequo/APS
affecto/APS
affirmo/APS
aggemino/APS
aggravo/APS
aggrego/APS
agito/APS
alligo/APS
alterato/A
alterno/APS
amo/APS
amputo/APS
animo/APS
anticipo/APS
apparo/APS
appello/APS
applico/APS
apporto/APS
approbo/APS
appropinquo/APS
approximo/AP
apto/APS
arbitro/A
arbitror/A
architector/A
argumentor/A
arieto/APS
arrogo/APS
aspero/APS
aspiro/APS
assigno/APS
assimilo/APS
associo/APS
attempero/AS
attento/APS
augmento/AS
auspico/APS
autumo/APS
baiulo/A
beo/A
brevio/APS
calculo/AS
caligo/APSq
candido/APS
capto/APS
castigo/APS
celebro/APS
celo/APS
certifico/AS
cesso/APS
circulo/APS
circulor/A
circumdo/A
circumsto/A
circumvolo/APS
cito/APS
clamo/APS
coacervo/APS
coaduno/APS
coagmento/APS
coapto/APS
coarcervo/APS
coarcto/APS
coarto/APS
cognomino/AS
collatero/APS
collibro/APS
colligo/ABPS
collimo/APS
colloco/APS
collustro/APS
coloro/APS
combino/AS
comitor/A
commemoro/APS
commendo/APS
commonstro/APS
commoror/A
commostro/APS
communico/APS
commuto/APS
compagino/A
comparo/APS
compello/ABPS
compenso/APS
complico/APS
comporto/APS
comprobo/APS
computo/APS
concateno/APS
concinno/APS
concomitor/A
conculco/APS
condemno/APS
configuro/APS
conflicto/APS
confoedero/APS
confuto/APS
conglutino/APS
coniecto/APS
connumero/APS
conservo/APS
consolor/A
conspiro/APS
consto/A
consydero/APS
contermino/APS
continuo/APS
conturbo/APS
copior/A
corono/APS
corusco/APS
crucio/APS
curo/APS
damno/APS
declaro/APS
decoro/APS
dedico/APS
degenero/APS
delecto/APS
delibo/APS
demonstro/APS
denoto/APS
deploro/APS
derivo/APS
desidero/APS
despero/A
desydero/APS
detrecto/APS
devolo/APS
dicto/APS
dilato/APS
discordo/APS
discrimino/APS
dispenso/A
disputo/APS
dissimulo/APS
disto/A
diversifico/AS
do/A
doto/APS
ducto/APS
duplo/AS
efformo/APS
elaboro/APS
elimo/APS
eluctor/A
emano/APS
erro/APS
evito/APS
exalto/APS
exaro/APS
excavo/APS
exclamo/APS
excuso/APS
exercito/APS
exonero/APS
expecto/APS
explico/APS
expostulo/APS
exspatior/A
extimo/A
exulo/APS
exupero/APS
factito/APS
fatigo/APS
figuro/APS
flammor/APS
fluctuo/APS
formo/APS
fortifico/APS
frequento/APS
fundo/APS
genero/APS
giro/APS
gravo/APS
hilaro/APS
iaculor/A
illumino/APS
imaginor/A
immoror/A
impero/APS
implico/APS
inauro/APS
incito/APS
incrusto/APS
incurvo/APS
indico/ABPS
inebrio/AP
inhabito/APS
innato/APS
insono/A
inspisso/APS
insudo/AP
integro/APS
interpretor/A
interseco/A
intro/APS
irradio/A
irrito/APS
itero/APS
iugo/APS
labo/APS
laetifico/APS
laudo/APS
lectito/APS
levo/APS
ligo/APS
loco/APS
mando/APS
meditor/A
mendico/APS
meo/APS
minoro/APS
mitigo/APS
modulor/A
moror/A
mutilo/APS
mutuor/A
navigo/APS
nego/APS
nomino/APS
noto/APS
numero/APS
obambulo/APS
obliquo/APS
observo/APS
obtenebro/A
occulto/APS
occurso/APS
offusco/APS
opero/A
oppugno/APS
ordino/APS
oro/APS
ostento/APS
paro/APS
pecco/APS
peragro/APS
peregrinor/A
perforo/APS
permeo/A
peroro/APS
persevero/APS
perspecto/APS
perturbo/APS
pondero/APS
postulo/APS
praedico/ABPS
praelibo/AS
praemonstro/APS
praeparo/APS
praesto/A
privo/APS
procrastino/A
procuro/APS
pronuntio/APS
propero/APS
propinquo/APS
protelo/APS
pugno/APS
pulso/APS
quadro/APS
quadruplo/AS
quincuplico/A
ratiocinor/A
recito/APS
recordor/A
rectifico/APS
refragor/AS
relego/APS
remigo/APS
reparo/APS
repraesento/APS
reputo/A
residuo/A
resto/A
retrogrado/A
revoco/A
roboro/APS
roro/APS
rotundo/APS
salto/APS
salvo/AS
scrutor/A
sector/A
segrego/APS
servo/APS
signo/APS
socio/APS
sono/A
speculor/A
spiro/APS
stipo/APS
subrogo/APS
subseco/A
sudo/APS
sulco/APS
suppedito/APS
suspicor/A
syllogizo/A
tempto/APS
termino/APS
tolero/APS
tracto/APS
triplico/APS
trucido/APS
turbo/APS
unda/A
vaco/APS
vapulo/A
vecto/APS
velo/APS
ventilo/APS
verso/APS
veto/A
violo/APS
vito/APS
volito/APS
voluto/AP
vulnero/APS
